Wisconsin, session 2025, AB13.
do enact as follows:AB13,13Section 1. 5.051 of the statutes is created to read:AB13,2,245.051 Repeal of emergency rule. The emergency rule promulgated by the 5elections commission that took effect on June 10, 2024, and that created s. EL 6.05, 1Wis. Adm. Code, relating to mandatory use of uniform instructions for absentee 2voting, is repealed.AB13,2,33